West Virginia, session 2026, SB324.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Attorney General. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on May 27, 1988, authorized under the authority of §47-14-9 of this code, relating to the Attorney General (administration of preneed burial contracts, 142 CSR 08), is authorized with the amendments set forth below: On page 1, by adding a new subsection 1.10. to read as follows:	"1.10. Sunset Provision – This rule shall terminate and have no further force or effect on August 1, 2036."